src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-v2_arvata_gt-norm.yaml
     #Verb 'kohata' - # meaning '' - '' v2_ata_odd - GOLD
     kohata+V+Inf: kohata
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kohtaan
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kohtaat
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kohtaa
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kohtaama
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kohtaatta
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kohtaava, kohtaa, kohathaan]
     kohata+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: kohathaan
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kohtaa
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [kohasin, kohtasin]
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kohasit, kohtasit]
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kohas, kohasi, kohtas, kohtasi]
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kohasimma, kohtasimma]
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kohasitta, kohtasitta]
     kohata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kohasit, kohathiin, kohtasit] #kohasiva, kohasivva, kohtasiva, kohtasivva
     kohata+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: kohathiin
     kohata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [kohaisin, kohtaisin]
     kohata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [kohaisit, kohtaisit]
     kohata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [kohais, kohtais]
     kohata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [kohtaisimma, kohaisimma]
     kohata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [kohaisitta, kohtaisitta]
     kohata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [kohaisit, kohaisiva, kohtaisit, kohtaisiva, kohtaisivva]
     kohata+V+InfE+Ine: kohatessa
     kohata+V+InfE+Ins: kohaten
     kohata+V+InfMa+Ill: [kohtaahmaan, kohtaamhaan]
     kohata+V+InfMa+Ine: kohtaamassa
     kohata+V+InfMa+Ela: kohtaamasta
     kohata+V+InfMa+Ade: kohtaamalla
     kohata+V+InfMa+Abe: kohtaamatta
     kohata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kohtaava
     kohata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kohtaavat
     kohata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kohattava #kohattavva
     kohata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kohattavat
     kohata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kohanu
     kohata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [kohahneet, kohanheet]
     kohata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kohattu
     kohata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kohatut
     kohata+V+Pass+Cond: kohattais #kohattas
     kohata+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: kohtaaminen


     #Verb 'leekata' - # meaning '' - '' v2_ata_odd - GOLD
     leekata+V+Inf: leekata
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leekaan
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: leekaat
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leekaa
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: leekaama
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: leekaatta
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [leekaava, leekaa, leekathaan]
     leekata+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: leekathaan
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: leekaa
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: leekasin
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: leekasit
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [leekas, leekasi]
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: leekasimma
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: leekasitta
     leekata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [leekasit, leekathiin] #leekasiva, leekasivva, 
     leekata+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: leekathiin
     leekata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: leekaisin
     leekata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: leekaisit
     leekata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: leekais
     leekata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: leekaisimma
     leekata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: leekaisitta
     leekata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [leekaisit, leekaisiva, leekaisivva]
     leekata+V+InfE+Ine: leekatessa
     leekata+V+InfE+Ins: leekaten
     leekata+V+InfMa+Ill: [leekaahmaan, leekaamhaan]
     leekata+V+InfMa+Ine: leekaamassa
     leekata+V+InfMa+Ela: leekaamasta
     leekata+V+InfMa+Ade: leekaamalla
     leekata+V+InfMa+Abe: leekaamatta
     leekata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: leekaava
     leekata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: leekaavat
     leekata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: leekattava #leekattavva
     leekata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: leekattavat
     leekata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: leekanu
     leekata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [leekahneet, leekanheet]
     leekata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: leekattu
     leekata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: leekatut
     leekata+V+Pass+Cond: leekattais #leekattas
     leekata+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: leekaaminen

     #Verb 'pakata' - # meaning '' - '' v2_ata_odd - GOLD
     pakata+V+Inf: pakata
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pakkaan
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pakkaat
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pakkaa
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: pakkaama
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: pakkaatta
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [pakkaava, pakkaa, pakathaan]
     pakata+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: pakathaan
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pakkaa
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pakkasin
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: pakkasit
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [pakkas, pakkasi]
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: pakkasimma
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: pakkasitta
     pakata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [pakathiin, pakkasit] #pakkasiva, pakkasivva
     pakata+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: pakathiin
     pakata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: pakkaisin
     pakata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: pakkaisit
     pakata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: pakkais
     pakata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: pakkaisimma
     pakata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: pakkaisitta
     pakata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [pakkaisit, pakkaisiva, pakkaisivva]
     pakata+V+InfE+Ine: pakatessa
     pakata+V+InfE+Ins: pakaten
     pakata+V+InfMa+Ill: [pakkaahmaan, pakkaamhaan]
     pakata+V+InfMa+Ine: pakkaamassa
     pakata+V+InfMa+Ela: pakkaamasta
     pakata+V+InfMa+Ade: pakkaamalla
     pakata+V+InfMa+Abe: pakkaamatta
     pakata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pakkaava
     pakata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pakkaavat
     pakata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: pakattava #pakattavva
     pakata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: pakattavat
     pakata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pakanu
     pakata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [pakahneet, pakanheet]
     pakata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: pakattu
     pakata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: pakatut
     pakata+V+Pass+Cond: pakattais #pakattas
     pakata+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: pakkaaminen

     #Verb 'tarjota' - # meaning '' - ''- GOLD
     tarjota+V+Inf: tarjota
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tarjoan
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tarjoat
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tarjoaa
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tarjoamma
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tarjoatta
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [tarjoaa, tarjoava, tarjoavva, tarjothaan]
     tarjota+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: tarjothaan
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tarjoa
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tarjosin
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tarjosit
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tarjos, tarjosi]
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tarjosimma
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tarjositta
     tarjota+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tarjosit, tarjothiin]
     tarjota+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: tarjothiin
     tarjota+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tarjoaisin
     tarjota+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tarjoaisit
     tarjota+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tarjoais
     tarjota+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tarjoaisima
     tarjota+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tarjoaisitta
     tarjota+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [tarjoaisit, tarjoaisiva]
     tarjota+V+InfE+Ine: tarjotessa
     tarjota+V+InfE+Ins: tarjoten
     tarjota+V+InfMa+Ill: [tarjoahmaan, tarjoamhaan]
     tarjota+V+InfMa+Ine: tarjoamassa
     tarjota+V+InfMa+Ela: tarjoamasta
     tarjota+V+InfMa+Ade: tarjoamalla
     tarjota+V+InfMa+Abe: tarjoamatta
     tarjota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tarjoava
     tarjota+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tarjoavat
     tarjota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tarjottava #, tarjottavva
     tarjota+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tarjottavat #, tarjottavvat]
     tarjota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tarjonu
     tarjota+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [tarjohneet, tarjonheet]
     tarjota+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tarjottu
     tarjota+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tarjotut
     tarjota+V+Pass+Cond: tarjottais
     tarjota+V+Der/minen+N+Sg+Nom: tarjoaminen

     #Verb 'havata' - # meaning '' - ''- GOLD
     havata+V+Inf: havata 
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: havatten
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: havattet
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: havattee
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: havattemma
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: havattetta
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [havattee, havatteva,  havattevva, havathaan]
     havata+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: havathaan
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: havatte
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: havattin
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: havattit
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: havatti
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: havattimma
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: havattitta
     havata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [havathaan, havattit]
     havata+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: havathiin
     havata+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: havattisin
     havata+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: havattisit
     havata+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: havattis
     havata+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: havattisima
     havata+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: havattisitta
     havata+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [havattisit, havattis, havattisiva]
     havata+V+InfE+Ine: havatessa
     havata+V+InfE+Ins: havaten
     havata+V+InfMa+Ill: [havattemhaan, havattehmaan]
     havata+V+InfMa+Ine: havattemassa
     havata+V+InfMa+Ela: havattemasta
     havata+V+InfMa+Ade: havattemala
     havata+V+InfMa+Abe: havattematta
     havata+V+Pass+Cond: havattais
     havata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: havatteva # havattevva, 
     havata+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: havattevat # havattevvat, 
     havata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: havattava # havattavva, 
     havata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: havattavat # havattavvat, 
     havata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: havanu
     havata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [havanheet, havahneet]
     havata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: havattu
     havata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: havatut
     havata+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: havatte
     havata+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: havatko
     havata+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: havatte
     havata+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: havatkaa
